Maryland, session 2025, SB0632.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
3–301.
(a) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, the Commissioner shall operate a
comprehensive rehabilitative prerelease unit for women that:
(1) is a separate structure in which the services specified in § 3–303(b) of
this subtitle are provided;
(2) has security features for female incarcerated individuals who:
(i) present the least risk of violence;
(ii) present the least risk of escape; and
(iii) have a record of satisfactory institutional behavior; and
(3) matches security level on a validated gender–responsive risk measure.
(b) [(1) In determining where to place a prerelease unit for women, the
Commissioner shall determine into which area, defined by zip codes, the largest percentage
of incarcerated individuals will likely be released.
(2)] A prerelease unit for women shall be:
(1) located in [or adjacent to the zip codes identified in paragraph (1) of this
subsection] BALTIMORE CITY ON A SITE THAT IS NOT LESS THAN 3 ACRES IN LAND
AREA; AND
(2) ABLE TO ACCOMMODATE THE ADMINISTRATION, HOUSING,
PROGRAMMING, AND SERVICES REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE FOR NOT FEWER
THAN THE LARGEST 1.25 TIMES THE NUMBER OF WOMEN AT THE MARYLAND
CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION FOR WOMEN WHO WERE ELIGIBLE FOR PRERELEASE
STATUS IN CALENDAR YEAR 2023 AS REPORTED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN ITS
OCTOBER 2024 REPORT TO THE SENATE BUDGET AND TAXATION COMMITTEE AND
THE HOUSE APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE.

SENATE BILL 632 3
(c) An incarcerated individual assigned to a prerelease unit for women may have
access to the community for any purpose described in § 3–305(a) of this subtitle.
(d) The Department shall:
(1) identify a location, acquire property, and design a site plan for the
prerelease unit for women on or before [June 1, 2021] DECEMBER 31, 2025;
(2) begin construction or renovation of the facility on or before [September
1, 2021] JULY 1, 2026; and
(3) begin operating and providing services in the facility on or before June
1, [2023] 2027.
3–301.1.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES SHALL:
(1) REVIEW AND EVALUATE ANY PROPOSALS CURRENTLY IN
POSSESSION OF THE DEPARTMENT FOR COMPLIANCE WITH THE FACILITY
REQUIREMENTS IN § 3–301 OF THIS SUBTITLE BY JUNE 1, 2025;
(2) IF NO CURRENT PROPOSAL EVALUATED UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SATISFIES WITH THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER § 3–301 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE EXPEDITED PROCUREMENT PROCESS UNDER
§ 13–108 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE, ISSUE A REQUEST
FOR PROPOSALS FOR THE PLANNING, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION OF A
PRERELEASE UNIT FOR WOMEN, AS REQUIRED UNDER § 3–301 OF THIS SUBTITLE,
BY AUGUST 1, 2025;
(3) REVIEW AND EVALUATE PROPOSALS IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
DEPARTMENT; AND
(4) AWARD A CONTRACT TO A PROVIDER AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE.
(B) A REQUEST FOR PROPOSALS ISSUED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL ACCURATELY AND COMPLETELY DESCRIBE, TO THE EXTENT
PRACTICABLE, THE LOCATION, USES, AND TIMELINE FOR DELIVERABLES TOWARD
COMPLETION OF THE PROJECT.
(C) THE CONTRACT AWARDED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(4) OF THIS SECTION
TO BUILD A PRERELEASE UNIT FOR FEMALE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS SHALL:

SENATE BILL 632
(1) COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS IN § 3–301 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
AND
(2) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, INCLUDE:
(I) HOUSING UNITS WITH DOUBLE AND SINGLE OCCUPANCY;
(II) HANDICAPPED ACCESSIBLE ROOMS, WHEELCHAIR RAMPS,
AND DESIGNATED HANDICAPPED PARKING SPACES;
(III) BATHROOMS THAT MAXIMIZE PRIVACY, DIGNITY, AND
SECURITY OF RESIDENTS, STAFF, AND VISITORS;
(IV) ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICES;
(V) INDOOR AND OUTDOOR MEETING, LOUNGE, AND VISITING
SPACES;
(VI) A CLASSROOM;
(VII) A CAREER CENTER;
(VIII) A NONEMERGENCY MEDICAL SUITE;
(IX) ON–SITE RECREATIONAL, CREATIVE, AND ATHLETIC
FACILITIES; AND
(X) ACCESS TO PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION.
3–303.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL” MEANS AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL
WITH PRERELEASE STATUS AT THE MARYLAND CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION FOR
WOMEN.
(3) “Evidence–based programs and practices” has the meaning stated in §
6–119 of this article.
(3) (4) “GENDER–RESPONSIVE SERVICES” MEANS PROGRAMS
THAT RECOGNIZE AND ACCOUNT FOR THE DIFFERENCES BETWEEN MEN AND THE
SPECIFIC NEEDS OF INCARCERATED WOMEN IN PRERELEASE STATUS REGARDING
THEIR PSYCHOLOGICAL DEVELOPMENT, SOCIALIZATION, CULTURE, EXPOSURE TO
TRAUMA, AND LIFE EXPERIENCES, AND CRIMINOGENIC RISKS TO REDUCE

SENATE BILL 632 5
CRIMINOGENIC RISKS AND SUPPORT SUCCESSFUL REENTRY, RECOVERY, AND
RECIDIVISM REDUCTION.
(4) (5) “Innovative programs and practices” has the meaning stated in §
6–119 of this article.
(6) “PRERELEASE AND REENTRY SERVICES” MEANS PROGRAMS THAT
ARE TAILORED TO ADDRESS THE SPECIFIC NEEDS OF ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUALS.
(b) (1) The Commissioner shall make evidence–based and gender–responsive
services available to ALL female incarcerated individuals WITH PRERELEASE STATUS
AND ALL FEMALE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS at the prerelease unit for women
required under § 3–301 of this subtitle, REGARDLESS OF WHICH FACILITY THE FEMALE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL WITH PRERELEASE STATUS IS CURRENTLY ASSIGNED
TO.
(2) THE SERVICES REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE
PROVIDED TO ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUALS BEFORE THE FINAL CONSTRUCTION AND
OCCUPATION OF THE FACILITY REQUIRED UNDER § 3–301 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) ON COMPLETION OF CONSTRUCTION AND OCCUPATION OF THE
FACILITY REQUIRED UNDER § 3–301 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE SERVICES REQUIRED
TO BE PROVIDED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT REQUIRE A FEMALE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL TO RECEIVE TRANSPORT IN ORDER TO ACCESS THE
SERVICES.
(4) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP A PLAN TO PROVIDE
COMPREHENSIVE GENDER–RESPONSIVE SERVICES TO ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUALS
ON–SITE AT THE MARYLAND CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION FOR WOMEN ON OR
BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2025.
(c) The comprehensive rehabilitative prerelease services shall utilize
evidence–based programs and practices and innovative programs and practices to:
(1) assist female incarcerated individuals in improving their education,
upgrading vocational skills, and obtaining suitable employment through classes to earn
industry certification or community college credits, workforce training, and job placement;
(2) provide female incarcerated individuals with the opportunity to
strengthen family and community relationships through extended family leave, parenting
workshops, and family reunification assistance;
(3) provide integrative and gender–responsive services, including medical
treatment, trauma–informed counseling, mental health treatment, and substance use

SENATE BILL 632
disorder treatment to address overall health and trauma needs and help female
incarcerated individuals achieve stable and productive roles in society; [and]
(4) develop individualized and comprehensive reentry plans involving
community provider partnerships for female incarcerated individuals to reduce barriers to
obtaining housing, jobs, education, health care, childcare and child welfare, transportation,
legal advocacy, case management, and other needs; AND
(5) ENSURE FEMALE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS AT THE
PRERELEASE UNIT FOR WOMEN ARE SCREENED FOR PUBLIC HEALTH BENEFITS
ELIGIBILITY AND ASSIST WITH PUBLIC HEALTH BENEFITS APPLICATIONS;
(6) ENSURE THAT EACH FEMALE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL AT THE
PRERELEASE UNIT FOR WOMEN HAS SECURED STABLE HOUSING THAT IS
REASONABLY EXPECTED TO REMAIN AVAILABLE TO THE INDIVIDUAL AND HER
DEPENDENTS FOR AT LEAST 1 YEAR AFTER RELEASE;
(7) ENGAGE FEMALE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS IN EDUCATION,
TRAINING, OR EMPLOYMENT ACTIVITIES TO PREPARE THE INDIVIDUAL TO HAVE
APPROPRIATE AND SUFFICIENT INCOME TO LIVE INDEPENDENTLY AFTER RELEASE;
AND
(8) ENSURE THE INDIVIDUAL HAS PERTINENT DOCUMENTS,
INCLUDING A BIRTH CERTIFICATE, A SOCIAL SECURITY CARD, HEALTH INSURANCE
INFORMATION, MEDICAL RECORDS, AND A DRIVER’S LICENSE OR STATE
IDENTIFICATION CARD AT RELEASE.
(D) THE COMPREHENSIVE REHABILITATIVE SERVICES REQUIRED UNDER
THIS SECTION SHALL BE PROVIDED AT THE PRERELEASE UNIT FOR WOMEN AND MAY
NOT REQUIRE THAT A FEMALE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL OBTAIN SERVICES AT:
(1) A DIFFERENT FACILITY FOR WOMEN;
(2) A FACILITY THAT TREATS OR HOUSES BOTH MALE AND FEMALE
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS; OR
(3) A FACILITY THAT HOUSES INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS THAT ARE
NOT ELIGIBLE FOR PRERELEASE STATUS.
(E) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
IMPLEMENT COMPREHENSIVE REHABILITATIVE PRERELEASE SERVICES IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.

SENATE BILL 632 7
(2) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 EACH YEAR, THE SOCIAL WORK UNIT
WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY A DETAILED OVERVIEW OF THE COMPREHENSIVE REHABILITATIVE
PRERELEASE SERVICES PROVIDED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION,
INCLUDING:
(I) GOALS AND OUTCOMES OF THE PROGRAMS;
(II) THE NUMBER OF PROGRAM PARTICIPANTS; AND
(III) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE DEPARTMENT BELIEVES IS
RELEVANT TO EVALUATING THE BENEFITS AND EFFECTIVENESS OF
COMPREHENSIVE REHABILITATIVE PRERELEASE SERVICES OFFERED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(F) OF THE FUNDS RECEIVED FROM THE PERFORMANCE INCENTIVE
GRANT FUND ESTABLISHED IN § 9–3209 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, UP
TO $500,000 MAY BE USED FOR COSTS TO IMPLEMENT COMPREHENSIVE
REHABILITATIVE PRERELEASE SERVICES IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That on or before June 1, 2026 July
1, 2025, the Department of Public Safety and Correctional Services shall provide an update
on the progress of construction of the Prerelease Unit for Women a preliminary report on
the progress the Department has made to comply with Section 1 of this Act, including any
specific steps taken and dates on which specific steps were taken to the Senate Judicial
Proceedings Committee and the House Judiciary Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257
of the State Government Article.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That on or before September 1,
2025, the Department of Public Safety and Correctional Services and the Department of
General Services shall provide an update on the progress of construction of the Prerelease
Unit for Women to the Senate Judicial Proceedings Committee, the Senate Budget and
Taxation Committee, the House Judiciary Committee, and the House Appropriations
Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.